lt-LT: Vaisių pjaustymo stilius: Gabalėliai; Kubeliais; Nuluptas; Ketvirčiais; Susmulkintas; Griežinėliais; Visas; Kita
fr: Type de découpe du fruit: Gros morceaux; En cubes; Pelé; En quartiers; Râpé; En tranches; Entier; Autre
hu: Gyümölcsvágási stílus: Darabolt; Kockázott; Hámozott; Negyedelt; Reszelt; Szeletelt; Egész; Egyéb
ja: フルーツカットスタイル: チャンク; キューブ; 皮むき; 4等分; シュレッド; スライス; ホール; その他
hr-HR: Stil rezanja voćem: Veći komadi; Narezano na kockice; Oguljeno; Narezano na četvrtine; Naribano; Narezano na ploške; Cijelo; Ostalo
es: Estilo de corte de fruta: Trozos; En cubos; Pelado; En cuartos; Rallado; En rodajas; Entero; Otro
vi: Kiểu cắt trái cây: Cắt khúc; Hạt lựu; Gọt vỏ; Cắt làm tư; Xé sợi; Cắt lát; Nguyên trái; Khác
fi: Hedelmän leikkaustyyli: Palat; Kuutioitu; Kuorittu; Neljään osaan leikattu; Raastettu; Viipaloitu; Kokonainen; Muu
th: สไตล์การหั่นผลไม้: หั่นชิ้นใหญ่; หั่นเต๋า; ปอกเปลือก; ผ่าสี่; ขูดฝอย; สไลซ์; ทั้งผล; อื่นๆ
it: Stile di taglio della frutta: Tocchetti; A cubetti; Sbucciata; A quarti; Tagliato a julienne; A fette; Intera; Altro
en: Fruit cut style: Chunks; Cubed; Peeled; Quartered; Shredded; Sliced; Whole; Other
sk-SK: Štýl nakrájania ovocia: Kusy; Na kocky; Ošúpané; Na štvrťky; Nastrúhané; Na plátky; Celé; Iné
da: Skærestil for frugt: Stykker; I tern; Skrællet; I kvarter; Revet; I skiver; Hel; Andet
el: Στυλ κοπής φρούτων: Μεγάλα κομμάτια; Σε κύβους; Ξεφλουδισμένα; Στα τέσσερα; Τριμμένα; Σε φέτες; Ολόκληρα; Άλλο
sl-SI: Slog rezanja sadja: Kosi; Kocke; Olupljeno; Četrtine; Naribano; Narezano; Celo; Drugo
ko: 과일 손질 방식: 청크; 큐브형; 껍질 벗김; 4등분; 채 썰기; 슬라이스; 통과일; 기타
pt-PT: estilo de corte de fruta: Pedaços grandes; Em cubos; Descascado; Em quartos; Ralado; Fatiado; Inteiro; Outro
pl: Styl krojenia owoców: Duże kawałki; W kostkę; Obrane; W ćwiartki; Wiórki; W plastrach; W całości; Inny
nb: Fruktskåret stil: Biter; Terninger; Skrelt; Delt i fire; Revet; Skivet; Hel; Annet
cs: Styl řezu ovoce: Kousky; Kostky; Oloupané; Čtvrtky; Nudličky; Plátky; Celé; Ostatní
nl: Fruit snijstijl: Stukken; In blokjes; Geschild; In kwarten; Geraspt; In plakjes; Heel; Anders
sv: Typ av fruktskärning: Bitar; Tärnad; Skalad; Kvartad; Strimlad; Skivad; Hel; Övrigt
zh-TW: 水果切法: 大塊; 切丁; 去皮; 切四等份; 切絲; 切片; 完整; 其他
ro-RO: Stilul tăiat al fructelor: Bucăți mari; Cubulețe; Decojit; Sferturi; Mărunțit; Feliat; Întreg; Altele
bg-BG: Стил на нарязване на плода: Едри парчета; На кубчета; Обелен; На четвъртини; Настърган; На резени; Цял; Друго
de: Schnittart des Obsts: Große Stücke; Gewürfelt; Geschält; Geviertelt; Geraspelt; In Scheiben; Ganz; Sonstige
zh-CN: 水果切制方式: 块状; 切丁; 去皮; 切四瓣; 丝状; 切片; 整个; 其他
pt-BR: Estilo de corte da frutas: Pedaços grandes; Em cubos; Descascado; Em quartos; Desfiado; Fatiado; Inteiro; Outro
ru: Способ нарезки фруктов: Кусочки; Кубики; Очищенные; Четвертинки; Измельченные; Ломтики; Целые; Другое
tr: Meyve kesim stili: İri parçalı; Küp doğranmış; Soyulmuş; Dörde bölünmüş; Rendelenmiş; Dilimlenmiş; Bütün; Diğer